Utah statutes.
53B-25-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) (a)  "Personal Internet account" means an online account that is used by a student or prospective student exclusively for personal communications unrelated to any purpose of the postsecondary institution.

(b)  "Personal Internet account" does not include an account created, maintained, used, or accessed by a student or prospective student for education related communications or for an educational purpose of the postsecondary institution.

(2)  "Postsecondary institution" means an institution that provides educational services offered primarily to persons who have completed or terminated their secondary or high school education or who are beyond the age of compulsory school attendance.



Enacted by Chapter 94, 2013 General Session

